Maryland, session 2026, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 28. DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGNS.
24–2801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1133*

HOUSE BILL 1133
(B) “DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGN” MEANS A PUBLIC HEALTH EFFORT
DESIGNED TO INFORM A TARGET AUDIENCE ABOUT A SPECIFIC MEDICAL CONDITION
AND THAT MAY INCLUDE INFORMATION RELATED TO:
(1) RISK FACTORS;
(2) SYMPTOMS;
(3) PREVENTION; AND
(4) TREATMENT OPTIONS.
(C) “DRUG MANUFACTURER” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(1) ENGAGES IN THE MANUFACTURE OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR
DEVICE; OR
(2) ENTERS INTO A LEASE WITH ANOTHER MANUFACTURER TO
MARKET AND DISTRIBUTE A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR DEVICE UNDER THE ENTITY’S
OWN NAME.
(D) “PATIENT ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT:
(1) PROVIDES EDUCATION, ADVOCACY, AND SUPPORT TO A PATIENT
OR THE CAREGIVER OF A PATIENT;
(2) IS CONCERNED WITH A MEDICAL CONDITION DIAGNOSED BY A
LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(3) HAS A MISSION THAT SEEKS TO HELP VULNERABLE INDIVIDUALS
OR THE FAMILIES OF INDIVIDUALS AFFECTED BY A MEDICAL CONDITION AND TAKES
ACTION CONSISTENT WITH THE MISSION.
24–2802.
(A) (1) WITH RESPECT TO A PATIENT ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION, THIS
SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PATIENT ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION THAT
RECEIVES FUNDING FROM A DRUG MANUFACTURER THAT IS DEVELOPING,
MANUFACTURING, OR MARKETING A DRUG OR DEVICE FOR THE MEDICAL
CONDITION THAT IS THE FOCUS OF THE DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGN.
(2) BEFORE CONDUCTING A DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGN IN THE
STATE, A DRUG MANUFACTURER OR PATIENT ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1133 3
(I) REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) DISCLOSE TO THE DEPARTMENT WHETHER THE DRUG
MANUFACTURER OR THE DRUG MANUFACTURER FROM WHICH THE PATIENT
ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION RECEIVES FUNDING IS DEVELOPING, MANUFACTURING,
OR MARKETING A DRUG OR DEVICE FOR THE MEDICAL CONDITION THAT IS THE
FOCUS OF THE DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGN; AND
(III) SPECIFY THE DRUG OR DEVICE THAT THE DRUG
MANUFACTURER IS DEVELOPING, MANUFACTURING, OR MARKETING.
(B) IF A DRUG MANUFACTURER OR PATIENT ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION
DISCLOSES UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION THAT THE FOCUS OF
THE DISEASE AWARENESS CAMPAIGN IS A DRUG OR DEVICE THAT IS BEING
MARKETED, MATERIALS PRODUCED AND DISTRIBUTED AS PART OF THE DISEASE
AWARENESS CAMPAIGN SHALL INCLUDE A STATEMENT DISCLOSING THE DRUG OR
DEVICE THAT IS BEING MARKETED.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.